District of Columbia statutes.
47-1031

Daughters of American Revolution — Square 173 — Lots 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, and 28.

The property situated in square 173 in the City of Washington, District of Columbia, described as lots 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, and 28, inclusive, occupied by the Daughters of the American Revolution, is hereby exempt from all taxation so long as the same is so occupied and used, subject to the provisions of § 47-1002, providing for exemptions of church and school property, and acts amendatory thereof.

History

Aug. 15, 1916, 39 Stat. 514, ch. 342
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1031.
1973 Ed., § 47-824.